Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 645.071, is amended to read: 645.071 STANDARD OF TIME. Every mention of, or reference to, any hour or time in any law is to be construed with reference to and in accordance with the standard time deleted text begin or advanced standard timedeleted text end provided by federal law. No department of the state government and no county, city or town shall employ any other time or adopt any ordinance or order providing for the use of any other time than the federal standard time deleted text begin or advanced standard timedeleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon the date and time that advanced standard time transitions to standard time in calendar year 2025 as provided by federal law, and expires on the date and time that the amendments made by Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 12, article 2, section 20, take effect. new text end